District of Columbia statutes.
1-306.43

Street or alley closings or zoning density increases associated with housing trust fund contributions.

An applicant who obtains a street or alley closing or a zoning density increase who is required to contribute funds to a housing trust fund pursuant to this part shall proceed in accordance with the following schedule:

(1)

Not less than 1/2 of the required total contribution shall be made prior to the issuance of a building permit for any of the commercial development; and

(2)

The balance of the required total contribution shall be made prior to the issuance of a certificate of occupancy for any of the commercial development.

Apr. 10, 1984, D.C. Law 5-76, § 3, 31 DCR 1049
Apr. 27, 1999, D.C. Law 12-275, § 2(a), 41 DCR 1500